Washington statutes.
RCW 19.60.075

Regulation by political subdivisions.

The regulation of pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers under this chapter is not intended to restrict political subdivisions from enacting ordinances or codes requiring the licensing of pawnbrokers and secondhand dealers or from enacting ordinances or codes which are more restrictive than the provisions of this chapter.

[ 1984 c 10 s 13.]